Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1843.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4321 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4321. Liability for support.(a) Liability.--Subject to the provisions of this chapter:(1) Married persons are liable for the support of each other according to their respective abilities to provide support as provided by law.(2) Parents are liable for the support of their children who are unemancipated and 18 years of age or younger.(2.1) Paragraph (2) applies whether or not parental rights of the parent have been terminated due to a conviction for any of the following where the other parent is the victim and a child has been conceived as a result of the offense:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape);(ii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault);(iii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault), where the offense involved sexual intercourse;(iv) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault), where the offense involved sexual intercourse; or(v) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4302 (relating to incest), where the offense involved sexual intercourse.Paternity of the child under this paragraph shall be established through voluntary acknowledgment of paternity or blood, genetic or other type of paternity test acceptable to the court. The cost of the testing shall be borne by the parent who was convicted of the offense.(3) Parents may be liable for the support of their children who are 18 years of age or older.( 4) Unless a parent suffers from an incapacitating intellectual disability or physical disability that prevents the parent from earning an income, following a divorce decree, the court shall order both parents to obtain gainful employment to provide for the needs of the child. The following apply regarding contempt:(i) A parent who willfully fails to comply with an order issued under this paragraph may, as prescribed by general rule, be adjudged in contempt.(ii) Contempt under this paragraph shall be punishable by any one or more of the following:(A) Imprisonment for a period not to exceed one year.20250HB1843PN2279 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) A fine not to exceed $5,000.(C) Probation for a period not to exceed two years.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Intellectual disability." As follows:(1) Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning of an individual, regardless of the age of the individual, that is accompanied by significant limitations in adaptive functioning in at least two of the following skill areas:(i) Communication.(ii) Self-care.(iii) Home living.(iv) Social and interpersonal.(v) Use of community resources.(vi) Self-direction.(vii) Functional academic.(viii) Work.(ix) Health and safety.(2) The term includes an autism spectrum disorder of an individual, regardless of the age of the individual."Physical disability." As follows:(1) A permanent or irreversible physical impairment, whether congenital or acquired by accident, injury or disease, that substantially limits one or more major life activities of the individual.(2) For the purposes of paragraph (1), major life activities include:20250HB1843PN2279 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Caring for oneself.(ii) Performing manual tasks.(iii) Seeing.(iv) Hearing.(v) Eating.(vi) Sleeping.(vii) Walking.(viii) Standing.(ix) Lifting.(x) Bending.(xi) Speaking.(xii) Breathing.(xiii) Working.Section 2. Section 6108 of Title 23 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6108. Relief.* * *(a.2) Alimony.--If the plaintiff is ordered to pay alimony to the defendant in accordance with section 3701 (relating to alimony), the court shall relieve the plaintiff of the duty to pay alimony to the defendant for the duration of the protection order under this section.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1843PN2279 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324